Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1689.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that:(1) The largest port complex in Washington is the northwest seaport alliance, comprised of the Ports of Tacoma and Seattle. Port operations, including vessel emissions, are a significant contributor to diesel particulate matter and greenhouse gases in the Seattle-Tacoma airshed;(2) Maritime-related emissions make up 20 percent of total diesel particulate matter emissions in the Puget Sound airshed â a huge avoidable risk;(3) In the United States, nearly 40 percent of Americans live within three miles of a port where ocean-going vessels are the number one driver of cancer risk to frontline communities at ports due to their diesel particulate emissions;(4) Reduction of greenhouse gas emissions and toxic air pollution is necessary to protect port communities, where pollution has disproportionately harmed working class communities and communities of color living in and near United States ports;(5) Opting into the California emission standards for ocean-going vessels at berth will provide significant and necessary air quality and climate benefits to residents of the state of Washington;(6) Under the federal clean air act, Washington has the option to implement California's vehicle emission standards such as the control measures for ocean-going vessels at berth;(7) Adoption of California's control measures for ocean-going vessels at berth coincides with record levels of federal and state funding available for ports that will support compliance with the emission standards. The Washington state legislature has allocated tens of millions of dollars for shore power at the state's ports;(8) The Washington state transportation electrification strategy report supports such recommendation: "In addition to infrastructure upgrades, the state should explore adopting California's 2020 ocean-going vessels at-berth regulation to ensure that shipping companies utilize the shore power being added to the ports"; and(9) Construction of shore power helps support jobs. A study conducted by MARAD in 2017 indicates that employment projections for 100 percent shore power by 2050 in Washington state range from 302 to 526 job-years at the state level, and from 232 to 405 job-years at the county level. The Port of Tacoma's TOTE terminal shore power project sustained an estimated 50 manufacturing and local installation jobs.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 70A.30 RCW to read as follows:(1) Pursuant to the federal clean air act, the department of ecology may adopt California's emission standards for ocean-going vessels at berth in Titles 13 and 17 of the California Code of Regulations. Rules adopted by the department of ecology must maintain consistency with the California emission standards and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 7507 (section 177 of the federal clean air act).(2) Rules adopted under this section may take effect no earlier than January 1, 2028. The department of ecology may extend the compliance timeline by no more than three years.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. Nothing in section 2 of this act limits or otherwise affects the obligation of a vessel on shore power and conducting cargo to meet proper crewing levels as per the vessel's certificate of inspection or to meet other requirements established under state or federal law to protect public health or the environment.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.--- END ---